Delaware, session 153, HB102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 39, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3911. Denial of Benefits to Individuals Convicted of Child Sex Abuse. An individual, or survivor, or beneficiary of an individual, who may otherwise be qualified to receive retirement or disability benefits as outlined in this chapter, shall not be permitted to receive these benefits following their conviction of sexual abuse of a student, Benefits are also denied to an individual under indictment for such an offense and willfully remains outside the United States for more than 1 month to avoid prosecution.